California statutes. Penal Code
(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 8.   (AB 117)   Effective June 30, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, pursuant to Secs. 68 and 69 of Ch. 39.    Note: This section was repealed and added on March 7, 2000, by initiative Prop. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

186.28.

(a) Any person, corporation, or firm who shall knowingly supply, sell, or give possession or control of any firearm to another shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or in a county jail for a term not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment if all of the
 following apply:

(1) The person, corporation, or firm has actual knowledge that the person will use the firearm to commit a felony described in subdivision (e) of Section 186.22, while actively participating in any criminal street gang, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 186.22, the members of which engage in a pattern of criminal activity, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 186.22.

(2) The firearm is used to commit the felony.

(3) A conviction for the felony violation under subdivision (e) of Section 186.22 has first been obtained of the person to whom the firearm was supplied, sold, or given possession or control pursuant to this section.

(b) This section shall only be applicable where the person is not convicted as a principal to the
 felony offense committed by the person to whom the firearm was supplied, sold, or given possession or control pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 278.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

186.30.

(a) Any person described in subdivision (b) shall register with the chief of police of the city in which he or she resides, or the sheriff of the county if he or she resides in an unincorporated area, within 10 days of release from custody or within 10 days of his or her arrival in any city, county, or city and county to reside there, whichever occurs first.

(b) Subdivision (a)
 shall apply to any person convicted in a criminal court or who has had a petition sustained in a juvenile court in this state for any of the following offenses:

(1) Subdivision (a) of Section 186.22.

(2) Any crime where the enhancement specified in subdivision (b) of Section 186.22 is found to be true.

(3) Any crime that the court finds is gang related at the time of sentencing or disposition.

(History: Added March 7, 2000, by initiative Proposition 21, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

186.31.

At the time of sentencing in adult court, or at the time of the dispositional hearing in the juvenile court, the court shall inform any person subject to Section 186.30 of his or her duty to register pursuant to that section. This advisement shall be noted in the court minute order. The court clerk shall send a copy of the minute order to the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction for the last known address of the person subject to registration under Section
 186.30. The parole officer or the probation officer assigned to that person shall verify that he or she has complied with the registration requirements of Section 186.30.

(History: Added March 7, 2000, by initiative Proposition 21, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

186.32.

(a) The registration required by Section 186.30 shall consist of the following:

(1) Juvenile registration shall include the following:

(A) The juvenile shall appear at the law enforcement agency with a parent or guardian.

(B) The law enforcement agency
 shall serve the juvenile and the parent with a California Street Terrorism Enforcement and Prevention Act notification which shall include, where applicable, that the juvenile belongs to a gang whose members engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal gang activity as described in subdivision (e) of Section 186.22.

(C) A written statement signed by the juvenile, giving any information that may be required by the law enforcement agency, shall be submitted to the law enforcement agency.

(D) The fingerprints and current photograph of the juvenile shall be submitted to the law enforcement agency.

(2) Adult registration shall include the following:

(A) The adult shall appear at the law enforcement agency.

(B) The law enforcement agency shall serve the adult with a California Street Terrorism Enforcement and Prevention Act notification which shall include, where applicable, that the adult belongs to a gang whose members engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal gang activity as described in subdivision (e) of Section 186.22.

(C) A written statement, signed by the adult, giving any information that may be required by the law enforcement agency, shall be submitted to the law enforcement agency.

(D) The fingerprints and current photograph of the adult shall be submitted to the law enforcement agency.

(b) Within 10 days of changing his or her residence address, any person subject to Section 186.30 shall inform, in writing, the law enforcement agency with
 whom he or she last registered of his or her new address. If his or her new residence address is located within the jurisdiction of a law enforcement agency other than the agency where he or she last registered, he or she shall register with the new law enforcement agency, in writing, within 10 days of the change of residence.

(c) All registration requirements set forth in this article shall terminate five years after the last imposition of a registration requirement pursuant to Section 186.30.

(d) The statements, photographs and fingerprints required under this section shall not be open to inspection by any person other than a regularly employed peace or other law enforcement officer.

(e) Nothing in this section or Section 186.30 or 186.31 shall preclude a court in its discretion from imposing the registration
 requirements as set forth in those sections in a gang-related crime.

(History: Added March 7, 2000, by initiative Proposition 21, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

186.33.

(a) Any person required to register pursuant to Section 186.30 who knowingly violates any of its provisions is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) (1) Any person who knowingly fails to register pursuant to Section 186.30 and is subsequently convicted of, or any person for whom a petition is subsequently sustained for a violation of, any of the offenses specified in Section 186.30, shall be punished by an additional term of imprisonment in the state prison for 16 months, or two or three years. The court shall order imposition of the middle term unless there are circumstances in aggravation or mitigation. The court shall state its reasons for the enhancement choice on
 the record at the time of sentencing.

(2) The existence of any fact bringing a person under this subdivision shall be alleged in the information, indictment, or petition, and be either admitted by the defendant or minor in open court, or found to be true or not true by the trier of fact.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 508, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 887, Sec. 4.   (SB 1016)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2022, by its own provisions.   Note: Section 186.33 was amended on March 7, 2000, by initiative Prop. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

186.34.

(a) For purposes of this section and Sections 186.35 and 186.36, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Criminal street gang” means an ongoing organization, association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or informal, having as one of its primary activities the commission of crimes enumerated in paragraphs (1) to (25), inclusive, and paragraphs (31) to (33), inclusive, of subdivision (e) of Section 186.22 who have a common identifying sign, symbol, or name, and whose members individually or collectively engage in or have engaged in a pattern of definable criminal activity.

(2) “Gang database” means any database
 accessed by a law enforcement agency that designates a person as a gang member or associate, or includes or points to information, including, but not limited to, fact-based or uncorroborated information, that reflects a designation of that person as a gang member or associate.

(3) “Law enforcement agency” means a governmental agency or a subunit of a governmental agency, and its authorized support staff and contractors, whose primary function is detection, investigation, or apprehension of criminal offenders, or whose primary duties include detention, pretrial release, posttrial release, correctional supervision, or the collection, storage, or dissemination of criminal history record information.

(4) “Shared gang database” means a gang database that is accessed by an agency
 or person outside of the agency that created the records that populate the database.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the following are not subject to this section, or Sections 186.35 and 186.36:

(1) Databases that designate persons as gang members or associates using only criminal offender record information, as defined in Section 13102, or information collected pursuant to Section 186.30.

(2) Databases accessed solely by jail or custodial facility staff for classification or operational decisions in the administration of the facility.

(c) (1) To the extent a local law enforcement agency elects to utilize a shared gang database prior
 to a local law enforcement agency designating a person as a suspected gang member, associate, or affiliate in a shared gang database, or submitting a document to the Attorney General’s office for the purpose of designating a person in a shared gang database, or otherwise identifying the person in a shared gang database, the local law enforcement agency shall provide written notice to the person, and shall, if the person is under 18 years of age, provide written notice to the person and the person’s parent or guardian, of the designation and the basis for the designation, unless providing that notification would compromise an active criminal investigation or compromise the health or safety of the minor.

(2) The notice described in paragraph (1) shall describe the process for the person, or, if the person is under 18 years of age, for
 the person’s parent or guardian, or an attorney working on behalf of the person, to contest the designation of the person in the database. The notice shall also inform the person of the reason for the person’s designation in the database.

(d) (1) (A) A person, or, if the person is under 18 years of age, the person’s parent or guardian, or an attorney working on behalf of the person, may request information of any law enforcement agency as to whether the person is designated as a suspected gang member, associate, or affiliate in a shared gang database accessible by that law enforcement agency and the name of the law enforcement agency that made the designation. A request pursuant to this paragraph shall be in writing.

(B) If a person about
 whom information is requested pursuant to subparagraph (A) is designated as a suspected gang member, associate, or affiliate in a shared gang database by that law enforcement agency, the person making the request may also request information as to the basis for the designation for the purpose of contesting the designation as described in subdivision (e).

(2) The law enforcement agency shall provide information requested under paragraph (1), unless doing so would compromise an active criminal investigation or compromise the health or safety of the person if the person is under 18 years of age.

(3) The law enforcement agency shall respond to a valid request pursuant to paragraph (1) in writing to the person making the request within 30 calendar days of receipt of the request.

(e) Subsequent to the notice described in subdivision (c) or the law enforcement agency’s response to an information request described in subdivision (d), the person designated or to be designated as a suspected gang member, associate, or affiliate, or the person’s parent or guardian if the person is under 18 years of age, may submit written documentation to the local law enforcement agency contesting the designation. The local law enforcement agency shall review the documentation, and if the agency determines that the person is not a suspected gang member, associate, or affiliate, the agency shall remove the person from the shared gang database. The local law enforcement agency shall provide the person and, if the person is under 18 years of age, the person’s parent or guardian, with written verification of the agency’s decision within
 30 days of submission of the written documentation contesting the designation. If the law enforcement agency denies the request for removal, the notice of its determination shall state the reason for the denial. If the law enforcement agency does not provide a verification of the agency’s decision within the required 30-day period, the request to remove the person from the gang database shall be deemed denied. The person or, if the person is under 18 years of age, the person’s parent or guardian may petition the court to review the law enforcement agency’s denial of the request for removal and order the law enforcement agency to remove the person from the shared gang
 database pursuant to Section 186.35.

(f) Nothing in this section shall require a local law enforcement agency to disclose any information protected under Section 1040 or 1041 of the Evidence Code or any provision listed in Section 7920.505 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 331.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

186.35.

(a) A person who is listed by a law enforcement agency in a shared gang database as a gang member, suspected gang member, associate, or affiliate and who has contested his or her designation pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 186.34, may petition the court to review the law enforcement agency’s denial of the request for removal and to order the law enforcement agency to remove the person from the shared gang database. The petition may be brought by the person or the person’s attorney, or if the person is under 18 years of age, by his or her parent or guardian or an attorney on behalf of the parent or guardian.

(b) The petition shall be filed and served within 90 calendar days of the agency’s mailing or personal service of the verification of
 the decision to deny the request for removal from the shared gang database or the date that the request is deemed denied under subdivision (e) of Section 186.34. A proceeding under this subdivision is not a criminal case. The petition shall be filed in either the superior court of the county in which the local law enforcement agency is located or, if the person resides in California, in the county in which the person resides. A copy of the petition shall be served on the agency in person or by first-class mail. Proof of service of the petition on the agency shall be filed in the superior court. For purposes of computing the 90-calendar-day period, Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be applicable.

(c) The evidentiary record for the court’s determination of the petition shall be limited to the agency’s statement of the basis of its designation made pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 186.34, and the documentation provided
 to the agency by the person contesting the designation pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 186.34.

(d) If, upon de novo review of the record and any arguments presented to the court, the court finds that the law enforcement agency has failed to establish the person’s active gang membership, associate status, or affiliate status by clear and convincing evidence, the court shall order the law enforcement agency to remove the name of the person from the shared gang database.

(e) The fee for filing the petition is as provided in Section 70615 of the Government Code. The court shall notify the person of the appearance date by mail or personal delivery. The court shall retain the fee under Section 70615 of the Government Code regardless of the outcome of the petition. If the court finds in favor of the person, the amount of the fee shall be reimbursed to the person by the agency.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 695, Sec. 6.   (AB 90)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

186.36.

(a) The Department of Justice is responsible for establishing regulations for shared gang databases. All shared gang databases shall comply with those regulations.

(b) The department shall administer and oversee the CalGang database. Commencing January 1, 2018, the CalGang Executive Board shall not administer or oversee the CalGang database.

(c) The department shall establish the Gang Database Technical Advisory Committee.

(d) Each appointee to the committee, regardless of the appointing authority, shall have the following characteristics:

(1) Substantial prior knowledge of issues related to gang intervention, suppression, or prevention efforts.

(2) Decisionmaking authority for, or direct access to those who have decisionmaking authority for, the agency or organization he or she represents.

(3) A willingness to serve on the committee and a commitment to contribute to the committee’s work.

(e) The membership of the committee shall be as follows:

(1) The Attorney General, or his or her designee.

(2) The President of the California District Attorneys Association, or his or her designee.

(3) The President of the California Public Defenders Association, or his or her designee.

(4) A representative of organizations that specialize in gang violence intervention, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(5) A representative of organizations that provide immigration services, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(6) The President of the California Gang Investigators Association, or his or her designee.

(7) A representative of community organizations that specialize in civil or human rights, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(8) A person who has personal experience with a shared gang database as someone who is or was impacted by gang labeling, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(9) The chairperson of the California Gang Node Advisory
 Committee, or his or her designee.

(10) The President of the California Police Chiefs Association, or his or her designee.

(11) The President of the California State Sheriffs’ Association, or his or her designee.

(f) The committee shall appoint a chairperson from among the members appointed pursuant to subdivision (e). The chairperson shall serve in that capacity at the pleasure of the committee.

(g) Each member of the committee who is appointed pursuant to this section shall serve without compensation.

(h) If a committee member is unable to adequately perform his or her duties, he or she is subject to removal from the board by a majority vote of the full committee.

(i) A vacancy on the committee as a result of the removal of a member shall be filled by the appointing authority of the removed member within 30 days of the vacancy.

(j) Committee meetings are subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(k) The department, with the advice of the committee, shall promulgate regulations governing the use, operation, and oversight of shared gang databases. The regulations issued by the department shall, at minimum, ensure the following:

(1) The system integrity of a shared gang database.

(2) All law enforcement agency and criminal justice agency personnel who access a shared gang database undergo comprehensive and standardized training on the use of shared gang databases and related policies and procedures.

(3) Proper criteria are established for supervisory reviews of all database entries and regular reviews of records entered into a shared gang database.

(4) Reasonable measures are taken to locate equipment related to the operation of a shared gang database in a secure area in order to preclude access by unauthorized personnel.

(5) Law enforcement agencies and criminal justice agencies notify the department of any missing equipment that could potentially compromise a shared gang database.

(6) Personnel authorized to access a shared gang database are limited to sworn law enforcement personnel, nonsworn law enforcement support personnel, or noncriminal justice technical or maintenance personnel, including information technology and information security staff and contract employees, who have been subject to character or security clearance and who have received approved training.

(7) Any records contained in a shared gang database are not disclosed for employment or military screening purposes.

(8) Any records contained in a shared gang database are not disclosed for purposes of enforcing federal immigration law, unless required by state or federal statute or regulation.

(9) The committee does not discuss or access individual records contained in a shared gang database.

(l) The regulations issued by the department shall include, but not be limited to, establishing the following:

(1) Policies and procedures for entering, reviewing, and purging documentation.

(2) Criteria for designating a person as a gang member or associate that are unambiguous, not overbroad, and consistent with empirical research on gangs and gang membership.

(3) Retention periods for information about a person in a shared gang database that is consistent with empirical research on the duration of gang membership.

(4) Criteria for designating an organization as a criminal street gang and retention periods for information about criminal street gangs. 

(5) Policies and procedures for notice to a person in a shared gang database. This includes policies and procedures for when notification would compromise an active criminal investigation or the health or safety of a minor.

(6) Policies and procedures for responding to an information request, a request for removal, or a petition for removal under Sections 186.34 and 186.35, respectively. This includes policies and procedures for a request or petition that could compromise an active criminal investigation or the health or safety of a minor.

(7) Policies and procedures for sharing information from a shared gang database with a federal agency, multistate agency, or agency of another state that is otherwise denied access. This includes sharing of information with a partner in a joint task force. 

(8) Implementation of supervisory review procedures and periodic record reviews by law enforcement agencies and criminal justice agencies, and reporting of the results of those reviews to the department.

(m) Shared gang databases shall be used and operated in compliance with all applicable state and federal regulations, statutes, and guidelines. These include Part 23 of Title 28 of the Code of Federal Regulations and the department’s Model Standards and Procedures for Maintaining Criminal Intelligence Files and Criminal Intelligence Operational Activities.

(n) The department, with the advice of the committee, no later than January 1, 2020, shall promulgate regulations to provide for periodic audits of each CalGang node and user agency to ensure the accuracy, reliability, and proper use of the CalGang database. The department shall mandate the purge of any information for which a user agency cannot establish adequate support.

(o) The department, with the advice of the committee, shall develop and implement standardized periodic training for everyone with access to the CalGang database.

(p) Commencing February 15, 2018, and annually on February 15 thereafter, the department shall publish an annual report on the CalGang database.

(1) The report shall include, in a format developed by the department, that contains, by ZIP Code, referring agency, race, gender, and
 age, the following information for each user agency: 

(A) The number of persons included in the CalGang database on the day of reporting.

(B) The number of persons added to the CalGang database during the immediately preceding 12 months.

(C) The number of requests for removal of information about a person from the CalGang database pursuant to Section 186.34 received during the immediately preceding 12 months.

(D) The number of requests for removal of information about a person from the CalGang database pursuant to Section 186.34 that were granted during the immediately preceding 12 months.

(E) The number of petitions for removal of information about a person from the CalGang database
 pursuant to Section 186.35 adjudicated in the immediately preceding 12 months, including their dispositions.

(F) The number of persons whose information was removed from the CalGang database due to the expiration of a retention period during the immediately preceding 12 months.

(G) The number of times an agency did not provide notice or documentation described in Section 186.34 because providing that notice or documentation would compromise an active criminal investigation, in the immediately preceding 12 months.

(H) The number of times an agency did not provide notice or documentation described in Section 186.34 because providing that notice or documentation would compromise the health or safety of the designated minor, in the immediately preceding 12 months.

(2) The report shall include the results from each user agency’s periodic audit conducted pursuant to subdivision (n).

(3) The department shall post the report on the department’s Internet Web site.

(4) The department shall invite and assess public comments following the report’s release, and each report shall summarize public comments received on prior reports and the actions taken in response to comments.

(q) The department shall instruct all user agencies to review the records of criminal street gang members entered into a shared gang database to ensure the existence of proper support for each criterion for entry in the shared gang database.

(r) (1) The department shall instruct each CalGang node agency to purge from a shared gang database any record of a person entered into the database designated as a suspected gang member, associate, or affiliate that does not meet criteria for entry or whose entry was based upon the following criteria: jail classification, frequenting gang neighborhoods, or on the basis of an untested informant. Unsupported criteria shall be purged and the records of a person shall be purged if the remaining criteria are not sufficient
 to support the person’s designation.

(2) After the purge is completed, the shared gang database shall be examined using a statistically valid sample, pursuant to professional auditing standards to ensure that all fields in the database are accurate.

(s) (1) Commencing January 1, 2018, any shared gang database operated by law enforcement in California including, but not limited to, the CalGang database, shall be under a moratorium. During the moratorium, data shall not be added to the database. Data in the database shall not be accessed by participating agencies or shared with other entities. The moratorium on a shared gang database shall not be
 lifted until the Attorney General certifies that the purge required in subdivision (r) has been completed. After the purge has been completed and before the department adopts the regulations required by this section, new data may be entered, provided the new data meets the criteria established by the conditions of the purge.

(2) The department shall not use regulations developed pursuant to this section to invalidate data entries entered prior to the adoption of those regulations.

(t) The department shall be responsible for overseeing shared gang database system discipline and conformity with all applicable state and federal regulations, statutes, and guidelines.

(u) The department may enforce a violation of a state or federal law or regulation with respect to a shared gang database, or a violation of regulation,
 policy, or procedure established by the department pursuant to this title by any of the following methods:

(1) Letter of censure.

(2) Temporary suspension of access privileges to the shared gang database system.

(3) Revocation of access privileges to the shared gang database system.

(v) The department shall temporarily suspend access to a shared gang database system or revoke access to a shared gang database system for any individual who shares information from a shared gang database for employment or military screening purposes.

(w) The department shall temporarily suspend access to a shared gang database system or revoke access to a shared gang database system for an individual who
 shares information from a shared gang database for federal immigration law purposes, unless required by state or federal statute or regulation.

(x) The department shall ensure that the shared gang database user account of an individual is disabled if the individual no longer has a need or right to access a shared gang database because he or she has separated from his or her employment with a user agency or for another reason.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 695, Sec. 7.   (AB 90)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 8. OF CRIMES AGAINST THE PERSON [187. - 248.]



  CHAPTER 1. Homicide [187. - 199.]

187.

(a) Murder is the unlawful killing of a human being, or a fetus, with malice aforethought.

(b) This section shall not apply to any person who commits an act that results in the death of a fetus if any of the following apply:

(1) The act complied with the former Therapeutic Abortion Act (Article 2 (commencing with Section 123400) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code) or the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) The act was committed by a holder of a physician’s
 and surgeon’s certificate, as defined in the Business and Professions Code, in a case where, to a medical certainty, the result of childbirth would be death of the person pregnant with the fetus or where the pregnant person’s death from childbirth, although not medically certain, would be substantially certain or more likely than not.

(3) It was an act or omission by the person pregnant with the fetus or was solicited, aided, abetted, or consented to by the person pregnant with the fetus.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall not be construed to prohibit the prosecution of any person under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 14.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

188.

(a) For purposes of Section 187, malice may be express or implied.

(1) Malice is express when there is manifested a deliberate intention to unlawfully take away the life of a fellow creature.

(2) Malice is implied when no considerable provocation appears, or when the circumstances attending the killing show an abandoned and malignant heart.

(3) Except as stated in subdivision (e) of Section 189, in order to be convicted of murder, a principal in a crime shall act with
 malice aforethought. Malice shall not be imputed to a person based solely on his or her participation in a crime.

(b) If it is shown that the killing resulted from an intentional act with express or implied malice, as defined in subdivision (a), no other mental state need be shown to establish the mental state of malice aforethought. Neither an awareness of the obligation to act within the general body of laws regulating society nor acting despite that awareness is included within the definition of malice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1015, Sec. 2.   (SB 1437)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

189.

(a) All murder that is perpetrated by means of a destructive device or explosive, a weapon of mass destruction, knowing use of ammunition designed primarily to penetrate metal or armor, poison, lying in wait, torture, or by any other kind of willful, deliberate, and premeditated killing, or that is committed in the perpetration of, or attempt to perpetrate, arson, rape, carjacking, robbery, burglary, mayhem, kidnapping, train wrecking, or any act punishable under Section 206, 286, 287, 288, or 289, or former Section 288a, or murder that is perpetrated by means of discharging a firearm from a motor vehicle, intentionally at another person outside of the vehicle with the intent to inflict death, is murder of the first degree.

(b) All other kinds of murders are of the
 second degree.

(c) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Destructive device” has the same meaning as in Section 16460.

(2) “Explosive” has the same meaning as in Section 12000 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Weapon of mass destruction” means any item defined in Section 11417.

(d) To prove the killing was “deliberate and premeditated,” it is not necessary to prove the defendant maturely and meaningfully reflected upon the gravity of the defendant’s act.

(e) A participant in the perpetration or attempted perpetration of a felony listed in subdivision (a) in which a death occurs is liable for murder
 only if one of the following is proven:

(1) The person was the actual killer.

(2) The person was not the actual killer, but, with the intent to kill, aided, abetted, counseled, commanded, induced, solicited, requested, or assisted the actual killer in the commission of murder in the first degree.

(3) The person was a major participant in the underlying felony and acted with reckless indifference to human life, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 190.2.

(f) Subdivision (e) does not apply to a defendant when the victim is a peace officer who was killed while in the course of the peace officer’s duties, where the defendant knew or reasonably should have known that the victim was a peace officer engaged in the performance of the peace officer’s
 duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 192.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Note: This section was amended on June 5, 1990, by initiative Prop. 115.)
-------------------------------------------

189.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that all unlawful killings that are willful, deliberate, and premeditated and in which the victim was a peace officer, as defined in Section 830, who was killed while engaged in the performance of his or her duties, where the defendant knew, or reasonably should have known, that the victim was a peace officer engaged in the performance of his or her duties, are considered murder of the first degree for all purposes, including the gravity of the offense and the support of the survivors.

(b) This section is declarative of existing
 law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 214, Sec. 2.   (AB 1459)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

189.5.

(a) Upon a trial for murder, the commission of the homicide by the defendant being proved, the burden of proving circumstances of mitigation, or that justify or excuse it, devolves upon the defendant, unless the proof on the part of the prosecution tends to show that the crime committed only amounts to manslaughter, or that the defendant was justifiable or excusable.

(b) Nothing in this section shall apply to or affect any proceeding under Section 190.3 or 190.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 897, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

190.

(a) Every person guilty of murder in the first degree shall be punished by death, imprisonment in the state prison for life without the possibility of parole, or imprisonment in the state prison for a term of 25 years to life. The penalty to be applied shall be determined as provided in Sections 190.1, 190.2, 190.3, 190.4, and 190.5.

Except as provided in subdivision (b), (c), or (d), every person guilty of murder in the second degree shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a term of 15 years to life.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), every person guilty of murder in the second degree shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a term of 25 years to life if the victim was a peace officer, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 830.1, subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 830.2, subdivision (a) of Section 830.33, or Section 830.5, who was killed while engaged in the performance of his or her duties, and the defendant knew, or reasonably should have known, that the victim was a peace officer engaged in the performance of his or her duties.

(c) Every person guilty of murder in the second degree shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a term of life without the possibility of parole if the victim was a peace officer, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 830.1, subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 830.2, subdivision (a) of Section 830.33, or Section 830.5, who was killed while engaged in the performance of his or her duties, and the defendant knew, or reasonably should have known, that the victim was a peace officer engaged in the performance of his or her duties, and any of the following facts has been charged and found true:

(1) The defendant specifically intended to kill the peace officer.

(2) The defendant specifically intended to inflict great bodily injury, as defined in Section 12022.7, on a peace officer.

(3) The defendant personally used a dangerous or deadly weapon in the commission of the offense, in violation of subdivision (b) of Section 12022.

(4) The defendant personally used a firearm in the commission of the offense, in violation of Section 12022.5.

(d) Every person guilty of murder in the second degree shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a term of 20 years to life if the killing was perpetrated by means of shooting a firearm from a motor vehicle, intentionally at another person outside of the vehicle with the intent to inflict great bodily injury.

(e) Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 2930) of Chapter 7 of Title 1 of Part 3 shall not apply to reduce any minimum term of a sentence imposed pursuant to this section. A person sentenced pursuant to this section shall not be released on parole prior to serving the minimum term of confinement prescribed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 760, Sec. 6.   Approved in Proposition 19 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Prior History: Added Nov. 7, 1978, by initiative Prop. 7; amended June 7, 1988, by Prop. 67 (from Stats. 1987, Ch. 1006); amended June 7, 1994, by Prop. 179 (from Stats. 1993, Ch. 609); amended June 2, 1998, by Prop. 222 (from Stats. 1997, Ch. 413, Sec. 1, which incorporated Stats. 1996, Ch. 598).)
-------------------------------------------

190.03.

(a) A person who commits first-degree murder that is a hate crime shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for life without the possibility of parole.
